Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-32,107
Council; powers.

The Missouri Basin Natural Resources Council may establish offices, employ the necessary staff, sponsor activities and programs, and conduct such meetings as the council deems advisable.

Laws 1985, LB 705, § 6.